Illinois, session 104th, SB3464.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5changing Section 5-5.4 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-5.4)  (from Ch. 23, par. 5-5.4)7    Sec. 5-5.4. Standards of payment; Department of Healthcare 8and Family Services. The Department of Healthcare and Family 9Services shall develop standards of payment of nursing 10facility and ICF/DD services in facilities providing such 11services under this Article which: 12    (1) Provide for the determination of a facility's payment 13for nursing facility or ICF/DD services on a prospective 14basis. The amount of the payment rate for all nursing 15facilities certified by the Department of Public Health under 16the ID/DD Community Care Act or the Nursing Home Care Act as 17Intermediate Care for the Developmentally Disabled facilities, 18Long Term Care for Under Age 22 facilities, Skilled Nursing 19facilities, or Intermediate Care facilities under the medical 20assistance program shall be prospectively established annually 21on the basis of historical, financial, and statistical data 22reflecting actual costs from prior years, which shall be 23applied to the current rate year and updated for inflation,   SB3464- 2 -LRB104 19667 KTG 33116 b1except that the capital cost element for newly constructed 2facilities shall be based upon projected budgets. The annually 3established payment rate shall take effect on July 1 in 1984 4and subsequent years. No rate increase and no update for 5inflation shall be provided on or after July 1, 1994, unless 6specifically provided for in this Section. The changes made by 7Public Act 93-841 extending the duration of the prohibition 8against a rate increase or update for inflation are effective 9retroactive to July 1, 2004. 10    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 11under the Nursing Home Care Act as Intermediate Care for the 12Developmentally Disabled facilities or Long Term Care for 13Under Age 22 facilities, the rates taking effect on July 1, 141998 shall include an increase of 3%. For facilities licensed 15by the Department of Public Health under the Nursing Home Care 16Act as Skilled Nursing facilities or Intermediate Care 17facilities, the rates taking effect on July 1, 1998 shall 18include an increase of 3% plus $1.10 per resident-day, as 19defined by the Department. For facilities licensed by the 20Department of Public Health under the Nursing Home Care Act as 21Intermediate Care Facilities for the Developmentally Disabled 22or Long Term Care for Under Age 22 facilities, the rates taking 23effect on January 1, 2006 shall include an increase of 3%. For 24facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health under 25the Nursing Home Care Act as Intermediate Care Facilities for 26the Developmentally Disabled or Long Term Care for Under Age   SB3464- 3 -LRB104 19667 KTG 33116 b122 facilities, the rates taking effect on January 1, 2009 2shall include an increase sufficient to provide a $0.50 per 3hour wage increase for non-executive staff. For facilities 4licensed by the Department of Public Health under the ID/DD 5Community Care Act as ID/DD Facilities the rates taking effect 6within 30 days after July 6, 2017 (the effective date of Public 7Act 100-23) shall include an increase sufficient to provide a 8$0.75 per hour wage increase for non-executive staff. The 9Department shall adopt rules, including emergency rules under 10subsection (y) of Section 5-45 of the Illinois Administrative 11Procedure Act, to implement the provisions of this paragraph. 12For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 13under the ID/DD Community Care Act as ID/DD Facilities and 14under the MC/DD Act as MC/DD Facilities, the rates taking 15effect within 30 days after June 5, 2019 (the effective date of 16Public Act 101-10) shall include an increase sufficient to 17provide a $0.50 per hour wage increase for non-executive 18frontline personnel, including, but not limited to, direct 19support persons, aides, frontline supervisors, qualified 20intellectual disabilities professionals, nurses, and 21non-administrative support staff. The Department shall adopt 22rules, including emergency rules under subsection (bb) of 23Section 5-45 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to 24implement the provisions of this paragraph. 25    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 26under the Nursing Home Care Act as Intermediate Care for the   SB3464- 4 -LRB104 19667 KTG 33116 b1Developmentally Disabled facilities or Long Term Care for 2Under Age 22 facilities, the rates taking effect on July 1, 31999 shall include an increase of 1.6% plus $3.00 per 4resident-day, as defined by the Department. For facilities 5licensed by the Department of Public Health under the Nursing 6Home Care Act as Skilled Nursing facilities or Intermediate 7Care facilities, the rates taking effect on July 1, 1999 shall 8include an increase of 1.6% and, for services provided on or 9after October 1, 1999, shall be increased by $4.00 per 10resident-day, as defined by the Department. 11    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 12under the Nursing Home Care Act as Intermediate Care for the 13Developmentally Disabled facilities or Long Term Care for 14Under Age 22 facilities, the rates taking effect on July 1, 152000 shall include an increase of 2.5% per resident-day, as 16defined by the Department. For facilities licensed by the 17Department of Public Health under the Nursing Home Care Act as 18Skilled Nursing facilities or Intermediate Care facilities, 19the rates taking effect on July 1, 2000 shall include an 20increase of 2.5% per resident-day, as defined by the 21Department. 22    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 23under the Nursing Home Care Act as skilled nursing facilities 24or intermediate care facilities, a new payment methodology 25must be implemented for the nursing component of the rate 26effective July 1, 2003. The Department of Public Aid (now   SB3464- 5 -LRB104 19667 KTG 33116 b1Healthcare and Family Services) shall develop the new payment 2methodology using the Minimum Data Set (MDS) as the instrument 3to collect information concerning nursing home resident 4condition necessary to compute the rate. The Department shall 5develop the new payment methodology to meet the unique needs 6of Illinois nursing home residents while remaining subject to 7the appropriations provided by the General Assembly. A 8transition period from the payment methodology in effect on 9June 30, 2003 to the payment methodology in effect on July 1, 102003 shall be provided for a period not exceeding 3 years and 11184 days after implementation of the new payment methodology 12as follows: 13        (A) For a facility that would receive a lower nursing 14    component rate per patient day under the new system than 15    the facility received effective on the date immediately 16    preceding the date that the Department implements the new 17    payment methodology, the nursing component rate per 18    patient day for the facility shall be held at the level in 19    effect on the date immediately preceding the date that the 20    Department implements the new payment methodology until a 21    higher nursing component rate of reimbursement is achieved 22    by that facility. 23        (B) For a facility that would receive a higher nursing 24    component rate per patient day under the payment 25    methodology in effect on July 1, 2003 than the facility 26    received effective on the date immediately preceding the   SB3464- 6 -LRB104 19667 KTG 33116 b1    date that the Department implements the new payment 2    methodology, the nursing component rate per patient day 3    for the facility shall be adjusted. 4        (C) Notwithstanding paragraphs (A) and (B), the 5    nursing component rate per patient day for the facility 6    shall be adjusted subject to appropriations provided by 7    the General Assembly. 8    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 9under the Nursing Home Care Act as Intermediate Care for the 10Developmentally Disabled facilities or Long Term Care for 11Under Age 22 facilities, the rates taking effect on March 1, 122001 shall include a statewide increase of 7.85%, as defined 13by the Department. 14    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, for 15facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health under 16the Nursing Home Care Act as skilled nursing facilities or 17intermediate care facilities, except facilities participating 18in the Department's demonstration program pursuant to the 19provisions of Title 77, Part 300, Subpart T of the Illinois 20Administrative Code, the numerator of the ratio used by the 21Department of Healthcare and Family Services to compute the 22rate payable under this Section using the Minimum Data Set 23(MDS) methodology shall incorporate the following annual 24amounts as the additional funds appropriated to the Department 25specifically to pay for rates based on the MDS nursing 26component methodology in excess of the funding in effect on   SB3464- 7 -LRB104 19667 KTG 33116 b1December 31, 2006:2        (i) For rates taking effect January 1, 2007, 3    $60,000,000.4        (ii) For rates taking effect January 1, 2008, 5    $110,000,000.6        (iii) For rates taking effect January 1, 2009, 7    $194,000,000. 8        (iv) For rates taking effect April 1, 2011, or the 9    first day of the month that begins at least 45 days after 10    February 16, 2011 (the effective date of Public Act 11    96-1530), $416,500,000 or an amount as may be necessary to 12    complete the transition to the MDS methodology for the 13    nursing component of the rate. Increased payments under 14    this item (iv) are not due and payable, however, until (i) 15    the methodologies described in this paragraph are approved 16    by the federal government in an appropriate State Plan 17    amendment and (ii) the assessment imposed by Section 5B-2 18    of this Code is determined to be a permissible tax under 19    Title XIX of the Social Security Act.20    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, for 21facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health under 22the Nursing Home Care Act as skilled nursing facilities or 23intermediate care facilities, the support component of the 24rates taking effect on January 1, 2008 shall be computed using 25the most recent cost reports on file with the Department of 26Healthcare and Family Services no later than April 1, 2005,   SB3464- 8 -LRB104 19667 KTG 33116 b1updated for inflation to January 1, 2006. 2    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 3under the Nursing Home Care Act as Intermediate Care for the 4Developmentally Disabled facilities or Long Term Care for 5Under Age 22 facilities, the rates taking effect on April 1, 62002 shall include a statewide increase of 2.0%, as defined by 7the Department. This increase terminates on July 1, 2002; 8beginning July 1, 2002 these rates are reduced to the level of 9the rates in effect on March 31, 2002, as defined by the 10Department. 11    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 12under the Nursing Home Care Act as skilled nursing facilities 13or intermediate care facilities, the rates taking effect on 14July 1, 2001 shall be computed using the most recent cost 15reports on file with the Department of Public Aid no later than 16April 1, 2000, updated for inflation to January 1, 2001. For 17rates effective July 1, 2001 only, rates shall be the greater 18of the rate computed for July 1, 2001 or the rate effective on 19June 30, 2001. 20    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, for 21facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health under 22the Nursing Home Care Act as skilled nursing facilities or 23intermediate care facilities, the Illinois Department shall 24determine by rule the rates taking effect on July 1, 2002, 25which shall be 5.9% less than the rates in effect on June 30, 262002.   SB3464- 9 -LRB104 19667 KTG 33116 b1    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, for 2facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health under 3the Nursing Home Care Act as skilled nursing facilities or 4intermediate care facilities, if the payment methodologies 5required under Section 5A-12 and the waiver granted under 42 6CFR 433.68 are approved by the United States Centers for 7Medicare and Medicaid Services, the rates taking effect on 8July 1, 2004 shall be 3.0% greater than the rates in effect on 9June 30, 2004. These rates shall take effect only upon 10approval and implementation of the payment methodologies 11required under Section 5A-12. 12    Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Section, for 13facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health under 14the Nursing Home Care Act as skilled nursing facilities or 15intermediate care facilities, the rates taking effect on 16January 1, 2005 shall be 3% more than the rates in effect on 17December 31, 2004. 18    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, for 19facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health under 20the Nursing Home Care Act as skilled nursing facilities or 21intermediate care facilities, effective January 1, 2009, the 22per diem support component of the rates effective on January 231, 2008, computed using the most recent cost reports on file 24with the Department of Healthcare and Family Services no later 25than April 1, 2005, updated for inflation to January 1, 2006, 26shall be increased to the amount that would have been derived   SB3464- 10 -LRB104 19667 KTG 33116 b1using standard Department of Healthcare and Family Services 2methods, procedures, and inflators. 3    Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Section, for 4facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health under 5the Nursing Home Care Act as intermediate care facilities that 6are federally defined as Institutions for Mental Disease, or 7facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health under 8the Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013, a 9socio-development component rate equal to 6.6% of the 10facility's nursing component rate as of January 1, 2006 shall 11be established and paid effective July 1, 2006. The 12socio-development component of the rate shall be increased by 13a factor of 2.53 on the first day of the month that begins at 14least 45 days after January 11, 2008 (the effective date of 15Public Act 95-707). As of August 1, 2008, the 16socio-development component rate shall be equal to 6.6% of the 17facility's nursing component rate as of January 1, 2006, 18multiplied by a factor of 3.53. For services provided on or 19after April 1, 2011, or the first day of the month that begins 20at least 45 days after February 16, 2011 (the effective date of 21Public Act 96-1530), whichever is later, the Illinois 22Department may by rule adjust these socio-development 23component rates, and may use different adjustment 24methodologies for those facilities participating, and those 25not participating, in the Illinois Department's demonstration 26program pursuant to the provisions of Title 77, Part 300,   SB3464- 11 -LRB104 19667 KTG 33116 b1Subpart T of the Illinois Administrative Code, but in no case 2may such rates be diminished below those in effect on August 1, 32008. 4    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 5under the Nursing Home Care Act as Intermediate Care for the 6Developmentally Disabled facilities or as long-term care 7facilities for residents under 22 years of age, the rates 8taking effect on July 1, 2003 shall include a statewide 9increase of 4%, as defined by the Department. 10    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 11under the Nursing Home Care Act as Intermediate Care for the 12Developmentally Disabled facilities or Long Term Care for 13Under Age 22 facilities, the rates taking effect on the first 14day of the month that begins at least 45 days after January 11, 152008 (the effective date of Public Act 95-707) shall include a 16statewide increase of 2.5%, as defined by the Department. 17    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, for 18facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health under 19the Nursing Home Care Act as skilled nursing facilities or 20intermediate care facilities, effective January 1, 2005, 21facility rates shall be increased by the difference between 22(i) a facility's per diem property, liability, and malpractice 23insurance costs as reported in the cost report filed with the 24Department of Public Aid and used to establish rates effective 25July 1, 2001 and (ii) those same costs as reported in the 26facility's 2002 cost report. These costs shall be passed   SB3464- 12 -LRB104 19667 KTG 33116 b1through to the facility without caps or limitations, except 2for adjustments required under normal auditing procedures. 3    Rates established effective each July 1 shall govern 4payment for services rendered throughout that fiscal year, 5except that rates established on July 1, 1996 shall be 6increased by 6.8% for services provided on or after January 1, 71997. Such rates will be based upon the rates calculated for 8the year beginning July 1, 1990, and for subsequent years 9thereafter until June 30, 2001 shall be based on the facility 10cost reports for the facility fiscal year ending at any point 11in time during the previous calendar year, updated to the 12midpoint of the rate year. The cost report shall be on file 13with the Department no later than April 1 of the current rate 14year. Should the cost report not be on file by April 1, the 15Department shall base the rate on the latest cost report filed 16by each skilled care facility and intermediate care facility, 17updated to the midpoint of the current rate year. In 18determining rates for services rendered on and after July 1, 191985, fixed time shall not be computed at less than zero. The 20Department shall not make any alterations of regulations which 21would reduce any component of the Medicaid rate to a level 22below what that component would have been utilizing in the 23rate effective on July 1, 1984. 24    (2) Shall take into account the actual costs incurred by 25facilities in providing services for recipients of skilled 26nursing and intermediate care services under the medical   SB3464- 13 -LRB104 19667 KTG 33116 b1assistance program. 2    (3) Shall take into account the medical and psycho-social 3characteristics and needs of the patients. 4    (4) Shall take into account the actual costs incurred by 5facilities in meeting licensing and certification standards 6imposed and prescribed by the State of Illinois, any of its 7political subdivisions or municipalities and by the U.S. 8Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to Title XIX 9of the Social Security Act. 10    The Department of Healthcare and Family Services shall 11develop precise standards for payments to reimburse nursing 12facilities for any utilization of appropriate rehabilitative 13personnel for the provision of rehabilitative services which 14is authorized by federal regulations, including reimbursement 15for services provided by qualified therapists or qualified 16assistants, and which is in accordance with accepted 17professional practices. Reimbursement also may be made for 18utilization of other supportive personnel under appropriate 19supervision. 20    The Department shall develop enhanced payments to offset 21the additional costs incurred by a facility serving 22exceptional need residents and shall allocate at least 23$4,000,000 of the funds collected from the assessment 24established by Section 5B-2 of this Code for such payments. 25For the purpose of this Section, "exceptional needs" means, 26but need not be limited to, ventilator care and traumatic   SB3464- 14 -LRB104 19667 KTG 33116 b1brain injury care. The enhanced payments for exceptional need 2residents under this paragraph are not due and payable, 3however, until (i) the methodologies described in this 4paragraph are approved by the federal government in an 5appropriate State Plan amendment and (ii) the assessment 6imposed by Section 5B-2 of this Code is determined to be a 7permissible tax under Title XIX of the Social Security Act.8    Beginning January 1, 2014 the methodologies for 9reimbursement of nursing facility services as provided under 10this Section 5-5.4 shall no longer be applicable for services 11provided on or after January 1, 2014. 12    No payment increase under this Section for the MDS 13methodology, exceptional care residents, or the 14socio-development component rate established by Public Act 1596-1530 of the 96th General Assembly and funded by the 16assessment imposed under Section 5B-2 of this Code shall be 17due and payable until after the Department notifies the 18long-term care providers, in writing, that the payment 19methodologies to long-term care providers required under this 20Section have been approved by the Centers for Medicare and 21Medicaid Services of the U.S. Department of Health and Human 22Services and the waivers under 42 CFR 433.68 for the 23assessment imposed by this Section, if necessary, have been 24granted by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services of 25the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services. Upon 26notification to the Department of approval of the payment   SB3464- 15 -LRB104 19667 KTG 33116 b1methodologies required under this Section and the waivers 2granted under 42 CFR 433.68, all increased payments otherwise 3due under this Section prior to the date of notification shall 4be due and payable within 90 days of the date federal approval 5is received. 6    On and after July 1, 2012, the Department shall reduce any 7rate of reimbursement for services or other payments or alter 8any methodologies authorized by this Code to reduce any rate 9of reimbursement for services or other payments in accordance 10with Section 5-5e. 11    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 12under the ID/DD Community Care Act as ID/DD Facilities and 13under the MC/DD Act as MC/DD Facilities, subject to federal 14approval, the rates taking effect for services delivered on or 15after August 1, 2019 shall be increased by 3.5% over the rates 16in effect on June 30, 2019. The Department shall adopt rules, 17including emergency rules under subsection (ii) of Section 185-45 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to 19implement the provisions of this Section, including wage 20increases for direct care staff. 21    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 22under the ID/DD Community Care Act as ID/DD Facilities and 23under the MC/DD Act as MC/DD Facilities, subject to federal 24approval, the rates taking effect on the latter of the 25approval date of the State Plan Amendment for these facilities 26or the Waiver Amendment for the home and community-based   SB3464- 16 -LRB104 19667 KTG 33116 b1services settings shall include an increase sufficient to 2provide a $0.26 per hour wage increase to the base wage for 3non-executive staff. The Department shall adopt rules, 4including emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45 of the 5Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the 6provisions of this Section, including wage increases for 7direct care staff. 8    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 9under the ID/DD Community Care Act as ID/DD Facilities and 10under the MC/DD Act as MC/DD Facilities, subject to federal 11approval of the State Plan Amendment and the Waiver Amendment 12for the home and community-based services settings, the rates 13taking effect for the services delivered on or after July 1, 142020 shall include an increase sufficient to provide a $1.00 15per hour wage increase for non-executive staff. For services 16delivered on or after January 1, 2021, subject to federal 17approval of the State Plan Amendment and the Waiver Amendment 18for the home and community-based services settings, shall 19include an increase sufficient to provide a $0.50 per hour 20increase for non-executive staff. The Department shall adopt 21rules, including emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45 22of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the 23provisions of this Section, including wage increases for 24direct care staff. 25    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 26under the ID/DD Community Care Act as ID/DD Facilities and   SB3464- 17 -LRB104 19667 KTG 33116 b1under the MC/DD Act as MC/DD Facilities, subject to federal 2approval of the State Plan Amendment, the rates taking effect 3for the residential services delivered on or after July 1, 42021, shall include an increase sufficient to provide a $0.50 5per hour increase for aides in the rate methodology. For 6facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health under 7the ID/DD Community Care Act as ID/DD Facilities and under the 8MC/DD Act as MC/DD Facilities, subject to federal approval of 9the State Plan Amendment, the rates taking effect for the 10residential services delivered on or after January 1, 2022 11shall include an increase sufficient to provide a $1.00 per 12hour increase for aides in the rate methodology. In addition, 13for residential services delivered on or after January 1, 2022 14such rates shall include an increase sufficient to provide 15wages for all residential non-executive direct care staff, 16excluding aides, at the federal Department of Labor, Bureau of 17Labor Statistics' average wage as defined in rule by the 18Department. The Department shall adopt rules, including 19emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45 of the Illinois 20Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the provisions of 21this Section. 22    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 23under the ID/DD Community Care Act as ID/DD facilities and 24under the MC/DD Act as MC/DD facilities, subject to federal 25approval of the State Plan Amendment, the rates taking effect 26for services delivered on or after January 1, 2023, shall   SB3464- 18 -LRB104 19667 KTG 33116 b1include a $1.00 per hour wage increase for all direct support 2personnel and all other frontline personnel who are not 3subject to the Bureau of Labor Statistics' average wage 4increases, who work in residential and community day services 5settings, with at least $0.50 of those funds to be provided as 6a direct increase to all aide base wages, with the remaining 7$0.50 to be used flexibly for base wage increases to the rate 8methodology for aides. In addition, for residential services 9delivered on or after January 1, 2023 the rates shall include 10an increase sufficient to provide wages for all residential 11non-executive direct care staff, excluding aides, at the 12federal Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics' 13average wage as determined by the Department. Also, for 14services delivered on or after January 1, 2023, the rates will 15include adjustments to employment-related expenses as defined 16in rule by the Department. The Department shall adopt rules, 17including emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45 of the 18Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the 19provisions of this Section. 20    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 21under the ID/DD Community Care Act as ID/DD facilities and 22under the MC/DD Act as MC/DD facilities, subject to federal 23approval of the State Plan Amendment, the rates taking effect 24for services delivered on or after January 1, 2024 shall 25include a $2.50 per hour wage increase for all direct support 26personnel and all other frontline personnel who are not   SB3464- 19 -LRB104 19667 KTG 33116 b1subject to the Bureau of Labor Statistics' average wage 2increases and who work in residential and community day 3services settings. At least $1.25 of the per hour wage 4increase shall be provided as a direct increase to all aide 5base wages, and the remaining $1.25 of the per hour wage 6increase shall be used flexibly for base wage increases to the 7rate methodology for aides. In addition, for residential 8services delivered on or after January 1, 2024, the rates 9shall include an increase sufficient to provide wages for all 10residential non-executive direct care staff, excluding aides, 11at the federal Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor 12Statistics' average wage as determined by the Department. 13Also, for services delivered on or after January 1, 2024, the 14rates will include adjustments to employment-related expenses 15as defined in rule by the Department. The Department shall 16adopt rules, including emergency rules as authorized by 17Section 5-45 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to 18implement the provisions of this Section. 19    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 20under the ID/DD Community Care Act as ID/DD facilities and 21under the MC/DD Act as MC/DD facilities, subject to federal 22approval of a State Plan Amendment, the rates taking effect 23for services delivered on or after January 1, 2025 shall 24include a $1.00 per hour wage increase for all direct support 25personnel and all other frontline personnel who are not 26subject to the Bureau of Labor Statistics' average wage   SB3464- 20 -LRB104 19667 KTG 33116 b1increases and who work in residential and community day 2services settings, with at least $0.75 of those funds to be 3provided as a direct increase to all aide base wages and the 4remaining $0.25 to be used flexibly for base wage increases to 5the rate methodology for aides. These increases shall not be 6used by facilities for operational and administrative 7expenses. In addition, for residential services delivered on 8or after January 1, 2025, the rates shall include an increase 9sufficient to provide wages for all residential non-executive 10direct care staff, excluding aides, at the federal Department 11of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics' average wage as 12determined by the Department. Also, for services delivered on 13or after January 1, 2025, the rates will include adjustments 14to employment-related expenses as defined in rule by the 15Department. The Department shall adopt rules, including 16emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45 of the Illinois 17Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the provisions of 18this Section. 19    For facilities licensed by the Department of Public Health 20under the ID/DD Community Care Act as ID/DD facilities and 21under the MC/DD Act as MC/DD facilities, subject to federal 22approval of a State Plan Amendment, the rates taking effect 23for services delivered on or after January 1, 2026 shall 24include a $0.80 per hour wage increase for all direct support 25personnel and all other frontline personnel who are not 26subject to the Bureau of Labor Statistics' average wage   SB3464- 21 -LRB104 19667 KTG 33116 b1increases and who work in residential and community day 2services settings, with at least $0.60 of those funds to be 3provided as a direct increase to all aide base wages and the 4remaining $0.20 to be used flexibly for base wage increases to 5the rate methodology for aides. These increases shall not be 6used by facilities for operational and administrative 7expenses. In addition, for residential services delivered on 8or after January 1, 2026, the rates shall include an increase 9sufficient to provide wages for all residential non-executive 10direct care staff, excluding aides, at the federal Department 11of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics' average wage as 12determined by the Department. Also, for services delivered on 13or after January 1, 2026, the rates will include adjustments 14to employment-related expenses as defined in rule by the 15Department. The Department shall adopt rules, including 16emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45 of the Illinois 17Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the provisions of 18this Section. 19    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section to the 20contrary, any regional wage adjuster for facilities located 21outside of the counties of Cook, DuPage, Kane, Lake, McHenry, 22and Will shall be no lower than 1.00, and any regional wage 23adjuster for facilities located within the counties of Cook, 24DuPage, Kane, Lake, McHenry, and Will shall be no lower than 251.15. 26    (5) For dates of service starting January 1, 2027,   SB3464- 22 -LRB104 19667 KTG 33116 b1reimbursement calculations and direct payments for services 2provided by facilities licensed under the ID/DD Community Care 3Act are the responsibility of the Department of Healthcare and 4Family Services. Appropriations for facilities licensed under 5the ID/DD Community Care Act must be shifted from the 6Department of Human Services to the Department of Healthcare 7and Family Services. Nothing in this Section shall prohibit 8the Department of Healthcare and Family Services from paying 9more than the rates specified in this Section. Nothing in this 10Section shall affect the requirements of Section 3-213 of the 11ID/DD Community Care Act. 12(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-588, eff. 7-1-24; 104-2, 13eff. 6-16-25.)